Illinois, session 104th, SB3671.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Residential Rental Property Registry Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Dwelling unit" means a room, a suite of rooms, or other 8residential real estate used for human habitation as the 9primary residence of the occupant.10    "Landlord" means the owner of a dwelling unit. 11    Section 10. Establishment of the Residential Rental 12Registry.13    (a) The State shall establish the Residential Rental 14Registry to be maintained and monitored by the Illinois 15Housing Development Authority.16    (b) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall 17prepare and make available an Internet registration web form 18for a landlord to complete that collects information that the 19Illinois Housing Development Authority deems necessary to 20fulfill the purposes of this Act, including, but not limited 21to, the following:22        (1) The street address and property index number of   SB3671- 2 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1    the building within which any dwelling unit is located;2        (2) The number of dwelling units in the building, the 3    number of floors in the building, the floor number and 4    unit number or letter designation for each dwelling unit 5    that is or may be available for rent at any time, and the 6    number of bedrooms in each dwelling unit;7        (3) The rental rate charged at the time of 8    registration for each dwelling unit;9        (4) The name, street address, email, and telephone 10    number of the landlord;11        (5) If the landlord is a corporation, partnership, 12    limited partnership, limited liability company, or other 13    entity, the name, title, street address, telephone number, 14    associated website address, and the email address of a 15    responsible individual partner, member, or officer.16        (6) The name, street address, email, associated 17    website address, and telephone number of the property 18    manager, if different from the landlord; and19        (7) The name, street address, telephone number, and 20    the email address of the person or entity a tenant is to 21    contact when requesting repairs and maintenance be made to 22    the dwelling unit, and the contact person's business 23    relationship to the owner.24    (c) For purposes of this Section, a post office box or 25commercial mail receiving service is not accepted as the 26landlord's or property manager's address. The building and   SB3671- 3 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1dwelling unit being registered is not accepted as the 2landlord's address, unless it is the principal place of 3business or residence of the landlord.4    (d) Failure to provide the required information or to pay 5the registration fee is grounds for Illinois Housing 6Development Authority to disallow registration. 7    Section 15. Registration.8    (a) Each landlord of one or more dwelling units in the 9State, including condominium and cooperative units, shall 10register each dwelling unit by January 1 of each year with the 11Residential Rental Registry. Registration of a condominium or 12cooperative unit is required only for the individual dwelling 13unit being rented or offered for rent and not for the entire 14building or development.15    (b) Within 15 days after a change in ownership of a 16dwelling unit, the new landlord shall notify the Illinois 17Housing Development Authority of the change.18    (c) A landlord may not allow a dwelling unit to be occupied 19or charge, accept, or retain rent unless the landlord has 20registered the dwelling unit with the Residential Rental 21Registry.22    (d) A landlord who has not paid the rental registry fee 23within the past 12 months for a particular dwelling unit may 24not increase the rent charged for the dwelling unit until the 25landlord pays, in full, the rental registry fee currently due   SB3671- 4 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1for the dwelling unit. 2    Section 20. Registration fees.3    (a) All landlords of dwelling units shall pay an annual 4registration fee in the amount of $100 per dwelling unit with 5the following exceptions:6        (1) A local housing authority is exempt from paying a 7    registration fee for a dwelling unit it owns.8        (2) An owner-occupied building of 6 or fewer units is 9    required to pay an annual registration fee of $50 per 10    dwelling unit.11    (b) Registration fees and fines collected under this Act 12shall be deposited into the Illinois Affordable Housing Trust 13Fund for the purpose of providing rental assistance.  14    Section 25. Penalties. Any person who provides false or 15misleading information to the Illinois Housing Development 16Authority is prohibited from filing an eviction action or 17other action under the Code of Civil Procedure seeking 18possession of any dwelling unit within the building for which 19the false or misleading information was provided and be fined 20$150 per dwelling unit. Each day that a violation exists 21constitutes a separate and distinct offense. 22    Section 30. Administration and rulemaking.23    (a) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall   SB3671- 5 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1administer this Act and adopt rules for the effective 2administration of this Act within 90 days of the effective 3date of this Act.4    (b) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall 5consult and cooperate with other relevant State departments 6and agencies in the implementation, administration, and 7enforcement of this Act.8    (c) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall 9establish and maintain the rental registry on a user-friendly, 10publicly accessible, searchable website, and include, in 11addition to the registration forms submitted by an owner, 12records of registration violations. This website shall 13maintain public access to these records for 10 years.14    (d) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall 15enforce any provision of this Act by seeking an injunction or 16any other relief in a court proceeding. 17    Section 900. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is 18amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 19    (310 ILCS 65/5)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1255)20    Sec. 5. Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund. 21    (a) There is hereby created the Illinois Affordable 22Housing Trust Fund, hereafter referred to in this Act as the 23"Trust Fund" to be held as a separate fund within the State 24Treasury and to be administered by the Program Administrator.   SB3671- 6 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1The purpose of the Trust Fund is to finance projects of the 2Illinois Affordable Housing Program as authorized and approved 3by the Program Administrator. The Funding Agent shall 4establish, within the Trust Fund, a General Account, a Bond 5Account, a Commitment Account and a Development Credits 6Account. The Funding Agent shall authorize distribution of 7Trust Fund moneys to the Program Administrator or a payee 8designated by the Program Administrator for purposes 9authorized by this Act. After receipt of the Trust Fund moneys 10by the Program Administrator or designated payee, the Program 11Administrator shall ensure that all those moneys are expended 12for a public purpose and only as authorized by this Act.13    (b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 8(c) of this 14Act, there shall be deposited in the Trust Fund such amounts as 15may become available under the provisions of this Act, 16including, but not limited to: 17        (1) all receipts, including dividends, principal and 18    interest repayments attributable to any loans or 19    agreements funded from the Trust Fund; 20        (2) all proceeds of assets of whatever nature received 21    by the Program Administrator, and attributable to default 22    with respect to loans or agreements funded from the Trust 23    Fund; 24        (3) any appropriations, grants or gifts of funds or 25    property, or financial or other aid from any federal or 26    State agency or body, local government or any other public   SB3671- 7 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1    organization or private individual made to the Trust Fund; 2        (4) any income received as a result of the investment 3    of moneys in the Trust Fund; 4        (5) all fees or charges collected by the Program 5    Administrator or Funding Agent pursuant to this Act; 6        (6) amounts as provided in Section 31-35 of the Real 7    Estate Transfer Tax Law; 8        (7) other funds as appropriated by the General 9    Assembly; and 10        (8) any income, less costs and fees associated with 11    the Program Escrow, received by the Program Administrator 12    that is derived from Trust Fund Moneys held in the Program 13    Escrow prior to expenditure of such Trust Fund Moneys.14    (c) Additional Trust Fund Purpose: Receipt and use of 15federal funding for programs responding to the COVID-19 public 16health emergency. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 17Act or any other law limiting or directing the use of the Trust 18Fund, the Trust Fund may receive, directly or indirectly, 19federal funds from the Homeowner Assistance Fund authorized 20under Section 3206 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 212021 (Public Law 117-2). Any such funds shall be deposited 22into a Homeowner Assistance Account which shall be established 23within the Trust Fund by the Funding Agent so that such funds 24can be accounted for separately from other funds in the Trust 25Fund. Such funds may be used only in the manner and for the 26purposes authorized in Section 3206 of the American Rescue   SB3671- 8 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1Plan Act of 2021 and in related federal guidance. Also, the 2Trust Fund may receive, directly or indirectly, federal funds 3from the Emergency Rental Assistance Program authorized under 4Section 3201 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 5and Section 501 of Subtitle A of Title V of Division N of the 6Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116–260). 7Any such funds shall be deposited into an Emergency Rental 8Assistance Account which shall be established within the Trust 9Fund by the Funding Agent so that such funds can be accounted 10for separately from other funds in the Trust Fund. Such funds 11may be used only in the manner and for the purposes authorized 12in Section 3201 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and in 13related federal guidance. Expenditures under this subsection 14(c) are subject to annual appropriation to the Funding Agent. 15Unless used in this subsection (c), the defined terms set 16forth in Section 3 shall not apply to funds received pursuant 17to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. Notwithstanding any 18other provision of this Act or any other law limiting or 19directing the use of the Trust Fund, funds received under the 20American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 are not subject to the terms 21and provisions of this Act except as specifically set forth in 22this subsection (c). 23    (d) Additional Trust Fund Purpose. The Trust Fund may also 24receive moneys that are designated for deposit into the Trust 25Fund as provided in the Residential Rental Property Registry 26Act. Those moneys may be used as provided in Section 20 of the   SB3671- 9 -LRB104 17841 JRC 31275 b1Residential Rental Property Registry Act. 2(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-8, eff. 7-1-23.)